Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 8.1 Domestic Assault

8-8.1-1.
Definitions.

The following words as used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:

“Cohabitants” means emancipated minors or persons eighteen (18) years of age or older, not related by blood or marriage, who together are not the legal parents of one or more children, and who have resided together within the preceding three (3) years or who are residing in the same living quarters.

“Course of conduct” means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of acts over a period of time, evidencing a continuity of purpose. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”

“Courts” means the district court.

“Cyberstalking” means transmitting any communication by computer to any person or causing any person to be contacted for the sole purpose of harassing that person or his or her family.

“Domestic abuse” means the occurrence of one or more of the following acts between cohabitants or the occurrence of one or more of the following acts between persons who are or have been in a substantive dating or engagement relationship within the past one year; “domestic abuse” shall be determined by the court’s consideration of the following factors:

The length of time of the relationship;

The type of the relationship;

The frequency of the interaction between the parties;

Attempting to cause or causing physical harm;

Placing another in fear of imminent serious physical harm;

Causing another to engage involuntarily in sexual relations by force, threat of force, or duress; or

Stalking or cyberstalking.

“Harassing” means following a knowing and willful course of conduct directed at a specific person with the intent to seriously alarm, annoy, or bother the person, and which serves no legitimate purpose. The course of conduct must be such as would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress, or be in fear of bodily injury.

“Sole legal interest” means defendant has an ownership interest in the residence and plaintiff does not; or defendant’s name is on the lease and plaintiff’s is not.

“Stalking” means harassing another person or willfully, maliciously, and repeatedly following another person with the intent to place that person in reasonable fear of bodily injury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 492, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 4; P.L. 1990, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 172; P.L. 2001, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 652, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 12; P.L. 2021, ch. 111, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 112, § 1, effective July 2, 2021.

8-8.1-2.
Filing of complaint.

Proceedings under this chapter shall be filed, heard, and determined in the district court of the division in which the plaintiff resides. Any proceedings under this chapter shall not preclude any other available civil or criminal remedies. A party filing a complaint under this chapter may do so without payment of any filing fee. If the plaintiff has left the residence or household to avoid abuse, he or she may bring the action in the court of previous residence or the court of present residence. There shall be no minimum residence requirements for the bringing of an action under this chapter.

Answers to the summons and complaint shall be made within ten (10) days of service upon the defendant and the action shall take precedence on the calendar. If no answer is filed within the time prescribed, judgment shall enter forthwith.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 492, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 4.

8-8.1-3.
Protective orders — Penalty — Jurisdiction.

A person suffering from domestic abuse may file a complaint in the district court requesting any order that will protect her or him from the abuse, including, but not limited to, the following:

Ordering that the defendant be restrained and enjoined from contacting, assaulting, molesting, or otherwise interfering with the plaintiff at home, on the street, or elsewhere;

Ordering the defendant to vacate the household forthwith, unless the defendant holds sole legal interest in the household;

Upon motion by the plaintiff, his or her address shall be released only at the discretion of the district court judge;

Ordering the defendant to surrender physical possession of all firearms in his or her possession, care, custody, or control and shall further order a person restrained not to purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, any firearms while the protective order is in effect. The defendant shall surrender the firearms within twenty-four (24) hours of notice of the protective order to the Rhode Island state police or local police department or to a federally licensed firearms dealer.

A person ordered to surrender possession of any firearm(s) pursuant to this section shall, within seventy-two (72) hours after being served with the order, either:

File with the court a receipt showing the firearm(s) was physically surrendered to the Rhode Island state police or local police department, or to a federally licensed firearm dealer; or

Attest to the court that, at the time of the order, the person had no firearms in his or her immediate physical possession or control, or subject to his or her immediate physical possession or control, and that the person, at the time of the attestation, has no firearms in his or her immediate physical possession or control or subject to his or her immediate physical possession or control.

If a person restrained under this section transfers a firearm(s) to a federally licensed firearms dealer pursuant to this section, the person restrained under this section may instruct the federally licensed firearms dealer to sell the firearm(s) or to transfer ownership in accordance with state and federal law, to a qualified named individual who is not a member of the person’s dwelling house, who is not related to the person by blood, marriage, or relationship as defined by §

15-15-1(7)

, and who is not prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal law. The owner of any firearm(s) sold shall receive any financial value received from its sale, less the cost associated with taking possession of, storing, and transferring of the firearm(s).

Every individual to whom possession of a firearm(s) is transferred pursuant to this subsection shall be prohibited from transferring or returning any firearm(s) to the person restrained under this section while the protective order remains in effect and shall be informed of this prohibition. Any knowing violation of this subsection is a felony that shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for a term of not less than one year and not more than five (5) years, or both.

An individual to whom possession of a firearm(s) is transferred pursuant to this subsection shall return a firearm(s) to the person formerly restrained under this section only if the person formerly restrained under this section provides documentation issued by a court indicating that the restraining order issued pursuant to this section that prohibited the person from purchasing, carrying, transporting, or possessing firearms has expired and has not been extended.

After notice to the respondent and after a hearing, which shall be held within fifteen (15) days of surrendering said firearms, the court, in addition to any other restrictions, may, for any protective order issued or renewed on or after July 1, 2017, continue the order of surrender, and shall further order a person restrained under this section not to purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, any firearms while the protective order is in effect.

The district court shall provide a notice on all forms requesting a protective order that a person restrained under this section shall be ordered pursuant to §

11-47-5

, to surrender possession or control of any firearms and not to purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, any firearms while the restraining order is in effect. The form shall further provide that any person who has surrendered their firearms shall be afforded a hearing within fifteen (15) days of surrendering their firearms.

Any firearm surrendered in accordance with this section to the Rhode Island state police or local police department shall be returned to the person formerly restrained under this section upon their request when:

The person formerly restrained under this section produces documentation issued by a court indicating that the restraining order issued pursuant to this section that prohibited the person from purchasing, carrying, transporting, or possessing firearms has expired and has not been extended; and

The law enforcement agency in possession of the firearms determines that the person formerly restrained under this section is not otherwise prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law.

The person required to surrender his or her firearms pursuant to this section shall not be responsible for any costs of storage of any firearms surrendered pursuant to this section.

The Rhode Island state police are authorized to develop rules and procedures pertaining to the storage and return of firearms surrendered to the Rhode Island state police or local police departments pursuant to this section. The Rhode Island state police may consult with the Rhode Island Police Chiefs’ Association in developing rules and procedures.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, expand, or in any way modify orders issued under §

12-29-4

or §

15-5-19

.

Nothing in this section shall limit a defendant’s right under existing law to petition the court at a later date for modification of the order.

The court shall immediately notify the person suffering from domestic abuse whose complaint gave rise to the protective order and the law enforcement agency where the person restrained under this section resides of the hearing.

The person suffering from domestic abuse, local law enforcement, and the person restrained under this section shall all have an opportunity to be present and to testify when the court considers the petition.

At the hearing, the person restrained under this section shall have the burden of showing, by clear and convincing evidence, that, if his or her firearm rights were restored, he or she would not pose a danger to the person suffering from domestic abuse or to any other person.

In determining whether to restore a person’s firearm rights, the court shall examine all relevant evidence, including, but not limited to: the complaint seeking a protective order; the criminal record of the person restrained under this section; the mental health history of the person restrained under this section; any evidence that the person restrained under this section has, since being served with the order, engaged in violent or threatening behavior against the person suffering from domestic abuse or any other person.

If the court determines, after a review of all relevant evidence and after all parties have had an opportunity to be heard, that the person restrained under this section would not pose a danger to the person suffering from domestic abuse or to any other person if his or her firearm rights were restored, then the court may grant the petition and modify the protective order and lift the firearm prohibition.

If the court lifts a person’s firearms prohibition pursuant to this subsection, the court shall issue the person written notice that he or she is no longer prohibited under this section from purchasing or possessing firearms while the protective order is in effect.

The prohibition against possessing a firearm(s) due solely to the existence of a domestic violence restraining order issued under this section shall not apply with respect to sworn peace officers as defined in §

12-7-21

and active members of military service, including members of the reserve components thereof, who are required by law or departmental policy to carry departmental firearms while on duty or any person who is required by his or her employment to carry a firearm in the performance of his or her duties. Any individual exempted pursuant to this exception may possess a firearm only during the course of his or her employment. Any firearm required for employment must be stored at the place of employment when not being possessed for employment use; all other firearm(s) must be surrendered in accordance with this section.

Any violation of the aforementioned protective order shall subject the defendant to being found in contempt of court.

No order shall issue under this section that would have the effect of compelling a defendant who has the sole legal interest in a residence to vacate that residence.

The contempt order shall not be exclusive and shall not preclude any other available civil or criminal remedies. Any relief granted by the court shall be for a fixed period of time not to exceed three (3) years, at the expiration of which time the court may extend any order upon motion of the plaintiff for such additional time as it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff from abuse. The court may modify its order at any time upon motion of either party.

Any violation of a protective order under this chapter of which the defendant has actual notice shall be a misdemeanor that shall be punished by a fine of no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

The penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties provided under §

12-29-5

.

“Actual notice” means that the defendant has received a copy of the order by service thereof or by being handed a copy of the order by a police officer pursuant to §

8-8.1-5(d)

.

The district court shall have criminal jurisdiction over all violations of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 492, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 7; P.L. 2005, ch. 148, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 153, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 385, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 111, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 112, § 1, effective July 2, 2021.

8-8.1-4.
Temporary orders — Ex parte proceedings.

Upon the filing of a complaint under this chapter, the court may enter any temporary orders that it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff from abuse.

If it clearly appears from specific facts shown by affidavit that immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result to the plaintiff, before notice can be served and a hearing held, the court may enter any temporary order without notice that it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff. Every order granted without notice shall expire by its terms within the time after entry, not to exceed twenty-one (21) days, as the court fixes, unless within the time so fixed the order: (i) by consent, or (ii) due to a failure to make service of process upon the defendant despite diligent efforts, or (iii) for good cause shown and after hearing of argument by the parties or counsel, is extended for an additional period. In case a temporary order is granted without notice, the matter shall be set down for hearing within a reasonable time and shall be given precedence over all matters except older matters of the same character, and when the matter comes on for hearing the party who obtained the temporary order shall proceed with the complaint for an order pursuant to §

8-8.1-3

, and, if she or he does not do so, the court shall dissolve the temporary order.

(i) When the court is unavailable after the close of business a complaint may be filed before any available district court judge who may grant relief to the plaintiff under this chapter upon cause shown in an ex parte proceeding.

No temporary order shall be granted pursuant to the provisions of this section unless it clearly appears from specific facts shown by the affidavit or by verified complaint that immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result to the plaintiff before notice can be served and a hearing held.

(ii)

In addition, when there is no district court in session at a location when the family court is in session, the family court judge at that location is authorized to grant relief to the plaintiff under this chapter upon cause shown in an ex parte proceeding.

Any order issued under this section and any documentation in support of an order shall be filed immediately with the clerk of the district court. The filing shall have the effect of commencing proceedings under this chapter and invoking the other provisions of this chapter.

The clerk of the district court shall have a certified copy of any order issued under this chapter forwarded immediately to the law enforcement agency designated by the plaintiff. The clerk shall also provide the plaintiff with two (2) certified copies of any order issued under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 492, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 4; P.L. 1989, ch. 78, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 198, § 1.

8-8.1-4.1.
Report to law enforcement agency.

Whenever the court grants a temporary order pursuant to §

8-8.1-4

based on a complaint alleging that a minor is suffering from domestic abuse, the court shall ensure that the appropriate law enforcement agency is notified of the complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 3.

8-8.1-4.2.
Return of service — Alternate service.

The complaint and any order issued under this chapter shall be personally served upon the defendant by a deputy sheriff or certified constable except as provided in subsections (c), (d), and (f) of this section. Service shall be made without payment of any fee when service is made by a deputy sheriff. At the election of the plaintiff, service pursuant to this subsection may also be made by a certified constable authorized to serve process of the district court pursuant to §

9-5-10.1

. The certified constable shall be entitled to receive the fee allowed by law for the service of a district court summons.

Return of service shall be forwarded by the deputy sheriff or certified constable to the clerk of court prior to the date set down for hearing on the complaint. If service has not been made, the deputy sheriff or certified constable shall indicate on the summons the reason therefor and the attempts made to serve the defendant.

At the time the return of service is sent to the clerk of the court, the deputy sheriff or certified constable shall cause a copy of the return of service to be sent to the plaintiff and to the appropriate law enforcement agency.

If, at the time of hearing on the complaint, the court determines that after diligent effort the deputy sheriff or certified constable has been unable to serve the defendant personally, the judge may order an alternate method of service designed to give reasonable notice of the action to the defendant and taking into consideration the plaintiff’s ability to afford the means of service ordered. Alternative service shall include, but not be limited to: service by certified and regular mail at defendant’s last-known address (excluding the residence that he or she has been ordered to vacate) or place of employment; leaving copies at the defendant’s dwelling or usual place of abode with a person of suitable age and discretion residing therein; or by publication in a newspaper for two (2) consecutive weeks. The court shall set a new date for hearing on the complaint and shall extend the temporary order until that date.

If the defendant appears in person before the court, the necessity for further service is waived and proof of service of that order is not necessary.

If the defendant is served notice regarding the complaint and hearing, but does not appear at the hearing, the clerk of the district court shall mail the defendant a copy of the resulting order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 15; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 7; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 7.

8-8.1-5.
Duties of police officers.

Whenever any police officer has reason to believe that a cohabitant or minor has been abused, that officer shall use all reasonable means to prevent further abuse, including:

Remaining on the scene as long as there is danger to the physical safety of the person or until the person is able to leave the dwelling unit;

Assisting the person in obtaining medical treatment necessitated by an assault, including obtaining transportation to an emergency medical treatment facility;

Giving the person immediate and adequate notice of his or her rights under this chapter;

Arresting the person pursuant to the arrest provisions as contained in §

12-29-3

.

Notice by the police officer to the victim shall be by handing the victim a copy of the following statement written in English, Portuguese, Spanish, Cambodian, Hmong, Laotian, Vietnamese, and French, and by reading the statement to the person when possible:

Spouse, former spouse/blood relative/children in common, minor(s) in a substantive dating or engagement relationship, a plaintiff parent’s minor child(ren) to which the defendant is not a blood relative or relative by marriage:

“If your attacker is your spouse, former spouse, person to whom you are related by blood or marriage, or if you are not married to your attacker, but have a child in common, or if you and/or your attacker are a minor who have been in a substantive dating or engagement relationship within the past one year, you have the right to go to the family court and ask the court to issue an order restraining your attacker from abusing you, your minor child, or a plaintiff parent’s minor child(ren) to which the defendant is not a blood relative or relative by marriage; you have the right to go to the family court and request:

An order restraining your attacker from abusing you, your minor child, or a plaintiff parent’s minor child(ren) to which defendant is not a blood relative or relative by marriage;

An order awarding you exclusive use of your marital domicile;

An order awarding you custody of your minor child.”

Unmarried/not related cohabitants within the past three (3) years or substantive dating or engagement relationship within past one year:

“If you are not married or related to your attacker, but have resided with him or her within the past three (3) years, you have the right to go to the district court and request:

An order restraining your attacker from abusing you;

An order directing your attacker to leave your household, unless she or he has the sole legal interest in the household.”

“If you are in need of medical treatment, you have the right to have the officer present obtain transportation to an emergency medical treatment facility.”

“If you believe that police protection is needed for your physical safety, you have the right to have the officer present remain at the scene until you and your children can leave or until your safety is otherwise insured.”

“You have the right to file a criminal complaint with the responding officer or your local police department if the officer has not arrested the perpetrator.”

A police officer shall ensure enforcement of the terms of the protective order issued pursuant to this chapter including, but not limited to, accompanying a cohabitant to his or her dwelling or residence in order to secure possession of the dwelling or residence when a vacate order against the defendant has been issued.

When service of the temporary order issued pursuant to §

8-8.1-4

has not been made and/or after a permanent order is entered, a police officer shall give notice of the order to the defendant by handing him or her a certified copy of the order. The officer shall indicate that he or she has given notice by writing on plaintiff ’s copy of the order and the police department’s copy of the order the date, and time of giving notice and the officer’s name and badge number. The officer shall indicate on the offense report that actual notice was given.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 492, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 4; P.L. 1994, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 66, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 68, § 1.

8-8.1-6.
Form of complaint.

A form in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of filing a complaint under this chapter:

A form in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of requesting temporary orders under this chapter:

STATE OF RHODE ISLAND DISTRICT COURT COUNTY OF DIVISION : Plaintiff : : VS : NO: : : Defendant : COMPLAINT FOR PROTECTION FROM ABUSE Pursuant to chapter 8.1 of title 8 I request that the court enter an order protecting me from abuse. (1) My full name, present street address, city and telephone number are as follows: (2) My former residence, at which I resided with the defendant, is as follows (street address and city): (3) My former residence is a house I own Defendant owns We jointly own My former residence is an apartment There is no lease My name is on lease and defendant's is not Defendant's name is on lease and mine is not Both our names are on lease (4) The full name, present street address, city and telephone number of the person causing me abuse (the defendant) are as follows: (5) On or about , without cause or provocation I suffered abuse when the defendant: Threatened or harmed with a weapon: (type of weapon used: ) Attempted to cause me physical harm; Caused me physical harm; Placed me in fear of imminent physical harm; Caused me to engage involuntarily in sexual relations by force, threat of force, or duress specifically, the defendant: (6) I ask that: The court order that the defendant be restrained and enjoined from contacting, assaulting, molesting or otherwise interfering with the plaintiff at home, on the street or elsewhere. The court order the defendant to immediately leave the household which is located at I request that the above relief be ordered without notice because it clearly appears from specific facts shown by affidavit or by the verified complaint that I will suffer immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage before notice can be served and a hearing had thereon. I understand that the court will schedule a hearing no later than twenty-one (21) days after such order is entered on the question of continuing such temporary order. (7) I have not sought protection from abuse from any other judge of the district court arising out of the same facts or circumstances alleged in this complaint. (Signature)(Date) Subscribed and sworn to before me in in the County of in the state of Rhode Island, this day of A.D. 20. Notary Public Note: If this complaint is filed by an attorney, the attorney's certificate should appear below: ATTORNEY CERTIFICATE Signed: Attorney for Plaintiff Address: Date: , 20 WHITE COPY Court YELLOW COPY Plaintiff PINK COPY Defendant GOLDENROD COPY Police Department

Click to view

STATE OF RHODE ISLAND DISTRICT COURT COUNTY OF DIVISION : Plaintiff : : VS : NO: : : Defendant : (TEMPORARY) ORDER PURSUANT TO CHAPTER OF THE G.L. OF R.I. Upon consideration of plaintiff’s complaint, (and having found that immediate and irreparable injury, loss or damage will result to the plaintiff before a notice can be served and a hearing had thereon) it is ORDERED: That the defendant is restrained and enjoined from contacting, assaulting, molesting, or otherwise interfering with plaintiff at home, on the street or elsewhere. That the defendant vacate forthwith the household located at A hearing on the continuation of this ORDER will be held at the District Court, County, Division, at (A.M.) (P.M.) on . If the defendant wishes to be heard, she/he will be heard at that time. If she/he does not appear at that time, this ORDER shall remain in effect. This ORDER is effective forthwith, and will remain in effect until the time and date of the above-mentioned hearing. A copy of this ORDER shall be transmitted to the appropriate local law enforcement agency forthwith, and shall be served in-hand on the defendant herein. ENTERED as an Order of Court this day of A.D. 20. ENTER: PER ORDER: Judge Clerk Presented by: Attorney for Plaintiff WHITE COPY Court YELLOW COPY Plaintiff PINK COPY Defendant GOLDENROD COPY Police Department

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 492, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 4; P.L. 1989, ch. 78, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 77, § 4, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 78, § 4, effective June 23, 2021.

8-8.1-7.
Notice of penalties — Notice of renewal.

Each protective order issued under this chapter, including a temporary ex-parte order, shall have the following statements printed in bold-faced type or in capital letters:

A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS ORDER MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND MAY BE PUNISHED BY A FINE OF AS MUCH AS $1,000 AND/OR BY CONFINEMENT IN JAIL FOR AS LONG AS ONE (1) YEAR, AND MAY BE ORDERED TO ATTEND COUNSELING. IF THE VICTIM WANTS THIS ORDER TO CONTINUE BEYOND THE EXPIRATION DATE, THE VICTIM MUST APPLY FOR A RENEWAL OF THE ORDER BEFORE THE EXPIRATION DATE.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 492, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 4; P.L. 1989, ch. 162, § 1.

8-8.1-8.
Appeal.

An order granting relief pursuant to §

8-8.1-3

shall remain in effect during the pendency of the appeal to the superior court unless the order is stayed by a justice of the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 492, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 213, § 1.